Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3084.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 106.9, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 263, O.S.L. 2023 (20 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 106.9), is amended to read as follows:
Section 106.9. A. Each court reporter regularly engaged by the
district court, the Workers' Compensation Court of Existing Claims,
or the Corporation Commission shall be paid a salary pursuant to the
salary schedule established by the annual appropriation for the
district courts and Corporation Commission and in accordance with
the job description for the position to which appointed. For fiscal
year 2023 2027 and each fiscal year thereafter, each court reporter

Req. No. 14725 Page 1

shal l receive an annual salary of Fifty-three Thousand Dollars
($53,000.00) Fifty-five Thousand Dollars ($55,000.00).
B. In addition to their base salaries, official court reporters
who are certified or licensed shorthand reporters and those acting
shorthand reporters pursuant to paragraph 3 of Section 106.3B of
this title shall be paid annually the sum of Four Hundred Dollars
($400.00) Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for each year of service to
the district court, the Workers' Compensation Court, the Workers'
Compensation Court of Existing Claims and the Corporation
Commission, with a maximum of twenty (20) years of service only to
be used for the purpose of longevity, not to exceed Eight Thousand
Dollars ($8,000.00) Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per year,
payable monthly. For the purpose of payment for longevity, "years
of service" is defined as all years served as a certified or
licensed court reporter in the district court, the Workers'
Compensation Court, the Workers' Compensation Court of Existing
Claims and the Corporation Commission after June 30, 1978.
Longevity payments shall be made on July 1 of each year following
completion of the first year of service as defined herein.
C. In addition to their base salaries, official court reporters
eligible for longevity payments pursuant to subsection B of this
section shall be paid an annual equipment allowance of Three
Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00). Payments for such allowance shall be

Req. No. 14725 Page 2

made on July 1 of each year following completion of the first year
of service as defined in subsection B of this section.
D. In addition to their base salaries, official court reporters
who are certified shorthand reporters shall be paid the following:
1. The sum of Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per year,
payable monthly, to any official court reporter who is a Registered
Professional Reporter (RPR), as recognized by the State Board of
Examiners of Certified Shorthand Reporters. To qualify as a RPR, an
official court reporter shall have a proficiency level in reporting
testimony and proceedings of a speed of not less than two hundred
twenty-five (225) words per minute in taking a question-and-answer-
type dictation, two hundred (200) words per minute in taking a jury
charge and one hundred eighty (180) words per minute in taking
literary material, shall pass a Written Knowledge Test with a score
of at least seventy percent (70%), all as determined by an
examination recognized by the Board, and shall complete thirty (30)
hours of continuing education per three-year cycle commencing at the
date of recognition;
2. The sum of Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per year,
payable monthly, to any official court reporter who is a Registered
Merit Reporter (RMR), as recognized by the State Board of Examiners
of Certified Shorthand Reporters. To qualify as a RMR, an official
court reporter shall have a proficiency level in reporting testimony
and proceedings of a speed of not less than two hundred sixty (260)
Req. No. 14725 Page 3

word s per minute in taking a question-and-answer-type dictation, two
hundred forty (240) words per minute in taking a jury charge and two
hundred (200) words per minute in taking literary material, shall
pass a Written Knowledge Test with a score of at least seventy
percent (70%), all as determined by an examination recognized by the
Board, and shall complete thirty (30) hours of continuing education
per three-year cycle commencing at the date of recognition;
3. The sum of Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per year,
payable monthly, to any official court reporter who is a Registered
Diplomat Reporter (RDR), as recognized by the State Board of
Examiners of Certified Shorthand Reporters, and who completes thirty
(30) hours of continuing education per three-year cycle commencing
at the date of recognition;
4. The sum of Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per year,
payable monthly, to any official court reporter who is a Certified
Realtime Reporter (CRR), as recognized by the State Board of
Examiners of Certified Shorthand Reporters, and who completes thirty
(30) hours of continuing education per three-year cycle commencing
at the date of recognition; or
5. Any official court reporter who is the holder of more than
one certification shall be compensated in the additional amounts
specified in paragraphs 1 through 4 of this subsection for each
certification up to a maximum of Eight Thousand Dollars ($8,000.00)
per year over and above the reporter's base salary, payable monthly.
Req. No. 14725 Page 4

E. Court reporters temporarily employed by the district court,
Workers' Compensation Court of Existing Claims, or Corporation
Commission shall be compensated by the court fund of the court which
they serve at a rate to be set by such court. In addition, court
reporters temporarily employed pursuant to this subsection who are
required by the terms of their employment to travel outside their
county of residence shall receive reimbursement for mileage actually
and necessarily traveled to and from the place of attendance at a
rate not to exceed the rate of reimbursement specified in the State
Travel Reimbursement Act for state employees. Any travel
reimbursement shall be paid from the court fund of the court where
the service of the temporarily employed court reporter is provided.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-14725 AQH 12/22/25





Req. No. 14725 Page 5